Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.140

Status of civil service employee preserved.

Any civil service employee of the state of Washington or of any political subdivision thereof while on leave of absence and on duty with any emergency management agency authorized under the provisions of this chapter shall be preserved in his or her civil service status as to seniority and retirement rights so long as he or she regularly continues to make the usual contributions incident to the retention of such beneficial rights as if he or she were not on leave of absence.

[ 2011 c 336 s 790; 1984 c 38 s 13; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 16; 1951 c 178 s 16.]